Hawaii statutes.
[§523A-5] Rules of taking custody.
Except as otherwise provided in this part or by other statute of this State,
property that is presumed abandoned, whether located in this or another state,
shall be subject to the custody of this State if:

(1) The last known address of the apparent owner, as
shown on the records of the holder, is in this State;

(2) The records of the holder do not reflect the
identity of the person entitled to the property and it is established that the
last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this State;

(3) The records of the holder do not reflect the last
known address of the apparent owner and it is established that:

(A) The last known address of the person
entitled to the property is in this State; or

(B) The holder is domiciled in this State or
is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this
State and has not previously paid or delivered the property to the state of the
last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the
property;

(4) The last known address of the apparent owner, as
shown on the records of the holder, is in a state that does not provide for the
escheat or custodial taking of the property and the holder is domiciled in this
State or is a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality of this State;

(5) The last known address of the apparent owner, as
shown on the records of the holder, is in a foreign country and the holder is
domiciled in this State or is a government or governmental subdivision, agency,
or instrumentality of this State;

(6) The transaction out of which the property arose
occurred in this State, the holder is domiciled in a state that does not
provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property, and the last known
address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is
unknown or is in a state that does not provide for the escheat or custodial
taking of the property; or

(7) The property is a traveler's check or money order
purchased in this State, or the issuer of the traveler's check or money order
has its principal place of business in this State and the issuer's records show
that the instrument was purchased in a state that does not provide for the
escheat or custodial taking of the property, or do not show the state in which
the instrument was purchased. [L 2008, c 55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next